Massachusetts, session 194th, S2428.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The ninth paragraph of section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2014 Official Edition, by inserting after the first sentence the following:-
An individual diagnosed with 1 of the autism spectrum disorders or the parent or
guardian of an individual diagnosed with 1 of the autism spectrum disorders may be issued a
placard, provided that the parent or guardian shall only use such placard when transporting the
individual diagnosed with 1 of the autism spectrum disorders.
of 1